Arkansas, session 2025, HB1844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-54-125(d), concerning the criminal
penalties for fleeing by means of any vehicle or conveyance, is amended to
add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(5)(A) Fleeing by means of any vehicle or conveyance under
subdivisions (d)(2) of this section is a Class C felony if the person exited
the vehicle while the vehicle or conveyance was still moving and continued to
flee on foot during the course of the offense.
(B) Fleeing by means of any vehicle or conveyance under
subdivisions (d)(3) of this section is a Class B felony if the person exited
the vehicle while the vehicle or conveyance was still moving and continued to
flee on foot during the course of the offense.
(C) Fleeing by means of any vehicle or conveyance under
*CRH210*
04-08-2025 14:10:18 CRH210

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1844
subdivisions (d)(4) of this section is a Class A felony if the person exited
the vehicle while the while the vehicle or conveyance was still moving and
continued to flee on foot during the course of the offense.

/s/Tosh































04-08-2025 14:10:18 CRH210